Utah statutes.
61-2b-32.   Licensure or certification prerequisite to suit for
compensation.
No person engaged in the business of real estate appraising in this state or
acting in the capacity of a real estate appraiser in this state may bring or
maintain any action in any court of this state to collect compensation for the
performance of real estate appraisal services for which registration,
licensure, or certification is required by this chapter without alleging and
proving that he was the holder of a valid registration, license, or
certification in this state at all times during the performance of such
services.
